Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.370

Merit system.

The metropolitan council shall establish and provide for the operation and maintenance of a personnel merit system for the employment, classification, promotion, demotion, suspension, transfer, layoff and discharge of its appointive officers and employees solely on the basis of merit and fitness without regard to political influence or affiliation. The person appointed or body created for the purpose of administering such personnel system shall have power to make, amend and repeal rules and regulations as are deemed necessary for such merit system. Such rules and regulations shall provide:

(1) That the person to be discharged or demoted must be presented with the reasons for such discharge or demotion specifically stated; and

(2) That he or she shall be allowed a reasonable time in which to reply thereto in writing and that he or she be given a hearing thereon within a reasonable time.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2107; 1965 c 7 s 35.58.370. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 37.]